Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2011
Integrated solid waste management, defined.

Integrated solid waste management shall mean solid waste management which is focused on planned development of programs and facilities that reduce waste toxicity and volume, recycle marketable materials, and provide for safe disposal of residuals.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 11.